District of Columbia statutes.
31-3417

Powers of insurance corporations.

(a)

An insurance company authorized to do business in the District may, either directly or through a subsidiary or affiliate, organize and operate a health maintenance organization under the provisions of this chapter. Notwithstanding any other provisions of law, any 2 or more such insurance companies, or subsidiaries or affiliates thereof, may jointly organize and operate a health maintenance organization. The business of insurance is deemed to include the providing of health care by a health maintenance organization owned or operated by an insurer or subsidiary thereof.

(b)

Notwithstanding any other provision of insurance laws, an insurer may contract with a health maintenance organization to provide insurance or similar protection against the cost of care provided through health maintenance organizations and to provide coverage in the event of the failure of a health maintenance organization to meet its obligations.

(c)

The enrollees of a health maintenance organization constitute a permissible group under such laws. Among other things, under such contracts the insurer may make benefit payments to health maintenance organizations for health care services rendered by providers.

Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-235, § 18, 44 DCR 818
Mar. 24, 1998, D.C. Law 12-81, § 46(d), 45 DCR 745

History

1981 Ed., § 35-4517.

Prior Codifications